Tennessee, session 114, HB1689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-502, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (d):
(1) In addition to the seizure and forfeiture provisions under subsection (c), a
POST-certified or state-commissioned law enforcement officer with probable cause to
believe that a motor vehicle has been used in drag racing may seize and impound the
motor vehicle pending further administrative or judicial review.
(2) Impoundment of a vehicle described in subdivision (d)(1) is limited to a
maximum of seventy-two (72) hours, during which the impounding authority must notify
the vehicle's owner or any known lienholder in writing. The notice must include the
reasons for impoundment, and the owner has the right to request an administrative
hearing, if applicable, or to petition the general sessions court for a judicial hearing.
(3) If an administrative hearing or hearing before the general sessions court is
requested or petitioned pursuant to subdivision (d)(2), then the hearing must be held
within five (5) business days of the request or petition, whereupon the owner may
contest the seizure. If probable cause is not substantiated, then any impoundment fees
paid by the owner must be reimbursed or the vehicle must be immediately released to
the owner at no cost if the vehicle is still impounded at the time of the hearing.
HB1689
009356
- 1 -

(4) This subsection (d) does not affect or supersede state seizure and forfeiture
under subsection (c) and title 40, chapter 33, part 1. A vehicle subject to impoundment
may still be seized and forfeited upon conviction.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009356